District of Columbia statutes.
29-803.04

Liability of members and managers.

(a)

The debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise shall:

(1)

Be solely the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company; and

(2)

Not become the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a member or manager solely by reason of the member acting as a member or manager acting as a manager regardless of the dissolution of the company.

(b)

The failure of a limited liability company to observe any particular formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs shall not be a ground for imposing liability on the members or managers for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company.

(c)

With respect to members of professional limited liability companies, a member shall be personally liable and accountable only for any negligent or wrongful acts or misconduct committed by the member, or by any individual under the member’s supervision and control in the rendering of professional service on behalf of a professional limited liability company organized under this chapter. A member of a professional limited liability company shall not be personally liable and accountable merely because of the member’s membership interest in the professional limited liability company.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(4), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-807.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added “regardless of the dissolution of the company” at the end of (a)(2); and substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” in (b).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 304 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.